Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 350.355 is amended to read:
350.355. (1)(a) [ Subject to ORS 352.237 and any group health and welfare insurance benefit  plan
developed under ORS  352.237,] Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  a part-
time faculty member at a public institution of higher education is eligible for the same employee-
only health care benefits  as full-time faculty members if the part-time faculty member is [ eligible for
membership in the Public  Employees Retirement System or another plan authorized under ORS chapter
238 or 238A  by teaching ] working at a level equal to at least half of a full-time equivalent
employee either at a single public institution of higher education or in aggregate at multiple public
institutions of higher education during  at least three of the four previous academic  terms  [ the
prior year].
(b) The total cost of providing any health benefit plan offered by  a public institution of
higher education to a part-time faculty member under this section may not increase annually
by more than the annual increase in premium amounts paid for contracted health  benefit
plans that is permitted under ORS 243.135 (8)(b) or 243.866 (9)(b).
(2)(a) In order to receive employee-only health care benefits under  this section, a part-
time faculty member  must select a home public institution of higher education for the du-
ration of the benefit year under a process established by each institution. A home  public
institution of higher education selected under this subsection:
(A) Must be one at which the part-time faculty  member is working during the academic
term at the time of the application; and
(B) Is responsible for:
(i) Determining whether the part-time faculty member is  eligible to receive health care
benefits under this section;
(ii) Determining, on  a semiannual basis, whether a part-time faculty member who was
found to be eligible to receive health care benefits  under sub-subparagraph (i) of this sub-
paragraph continues to be eligible to receive health care benefits under this section;
(iii) Collecting the premiums for health benefit plans that must be paid  by the part-time
faculty member under subsection (3) of this section;
Enrolled Senate Bill 551 (SB 551-A) Page 1
(iv) Paying the full cost of the  insurance premiums for providing health benefit plans to
the part-time faculty member, subject  to reimbursement as described in subsection (4) of
this section; and
(v) Administering and providing health benefit plans to  the part-time faculty member in
the manner described in this section.
(b) In order to receive health care benefits under this section, a  part-time faculty mem-
ber must  provide the home public institution of higher education with all information nec-
essary for the institution to determine  the eligibility of the part-time faculty member to
receive health care benefits under this section.
[(2)] (3)(a) Except as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  a part-time faculty mem-
ber at a public institution of higher education shall pay 10 percent of all  insurance premiums for
health benefit plans [health care benefits unless otherwise  provided for by the policy of the institution
or by collective bargaining at the institution ].
(b) A  public institution of higher education may provide by collective bargaining at the
institution to pay for some or all of the insurance premiums  that must otherwise be paid by
a part-time faculty member under paragraph (a)  of this subsection. The public institution
of higher education may not be reimbursed under subsection  (4) of this section for the costs
the institution incurs to provide health benefit plans under this paragraph.
(4)(a) Every  three months a public institution of higher education may request re-
imbursement from the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission for the cost of paying
insurance premiums for  providing health benefit plans to each part-time faculty member who
has selected the institution as the faculty member’s home public institution  of higher edu-
cation under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) The commission shall use moneys from the  Part-Time Faculty Insurance Fund es-
tablished under section 4 of this  2021 Act to fully reimburse each public institution of higher
education for all documented costs requested by the  institution under this subsection, except
for any costs described in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Unless otherwise provided  for by collective bargaining, a part-time faculty member
at a public institution of higher education  who is eligible for health care benefits under
subsection (1) of this section may  receive health care benefits only in the manner provided
by this section.
(6) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may  adopt rules necessary to imple-
ment subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 2. A public institution of higher education that,  on the effective date of this
2021 Act,  provided health care benefits to part-time faculty members who are not eligible for
health care benefits under the amendments to ORS 350.355 by section 1 of this 2021 Act:
(1) May  not increase the eligibility requirements that must be met by a part-time faculty
member who is not eligible for health care benefits under the  amendments to ORS 350.355
by section 1 of  this 2021 Act in order for the part-time faculty member to qualify for health
care benefits from the institution; and
(2) Must continue  to provide comparable health care benefits to part-time faculty mem-
bers who are not eligible  for health care benefits under the amendments to ORS 350.355 by
section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. Any realized savings by a public institution of higher education  as a result
of the amendments to ORS 350.355 by section 1 of this 2021 Act  are considered employment
relations for purposes of collective bargaining under ORS 243.650 to 243.782.
SECTION 4. The Part-Time  Faculty Insurance Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Part-Time Faculty  In-
surance Fund must be credited to the  fund. The fund consists of moneys appropriated, allo-
cated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise  and
interest earned on moneys in the fund. The moneys in the  fund are continuously appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  for the purpose of reimbursing public
Enrolled Senate Bill 551 (SB 551-A) Page 2
institutions of higher education for the cost of paying premiums for health benefit plans for
part-time faculty under ORS 350.355.
SECTION 5.
There is appropriated to the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $12,900,000  for
deposit in the Part-Time Faculty Insurance Fund established under section 4 of this 2021 Act,
for the purposes specified under section 4 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 6. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the amendments to
ORS 350.355 by section 1 of this 2021 Act apply to health benefit  plans offered to part-time
faculty members on or after October 1, 2021.
(2) To the extent that  a conflict exists, the terms of collective bargaining agreements and
other contracts entered into before the effective date of  this 2021 Act shall prevail over the
amendments to ORS 350.355 by section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 7. The Higher Education  Coordinating Commission and public institutions of
higher education shall, before the applicability date specified in section 6 of this 2021 Act,
take any actions necessary to implement the amendments to ORS 350.355 by  section 1 of this
2021 Act on the applicability date specified in section 6 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 8.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 551 (SB 551-A) Page 3